Virginia statutes. Title 54.1. Professions and Occupations.
Chapter 30.
Nursing.

Article 6.

Nurse Licensure Compact.

54.1-3030.Definitions.

54.1-3031.Findings and declaration of purpose for compact.

54.1-3032.General provisions and jurisdiction.

54.1-3033.Applications for licensure in a party state.

54.1-3034.Adverse actions.

54.1-3035.Additional authorities invested in party state nursing licensing boards.

54.1-3036.Coordinated licensure information system.

54.1-3037.Compact administration and interchange of information.

54.1-3038.Immunity.

54.1-3039.Entry into force, withdrawal and amendment.

54.1-3040.Construction and severability.